dictsource/lij_rules
.replace
  œ    eu
  á    à
  í    ì
  ú    ù
  gli  ggi

// 's' is [s] between these and a vowel
.L01 a æ e i o ò u
// 's' is [z] before these
.L02 b d g l m n r v

// simple vowels followed by these + a short vowel + word end are typically long
.L03 b br cr ç d f gr l m n p pr r s t tr v vr x z
// short vowels in end position
.L04 a e i o u
// simple vowels followed by these + word end are also typically long
.L05 ca ce ci co cu cio cia ciu chi che ga ge gi go gu gio gia giu ghi ghe

// imperfect tense endings
.L06 va vo vi vimo van
// conditional mood endings  (except for -æ which clashes with present indicative)
.L07 eiva eivo ësci ëscimo eivan æn
// future tense endings (except for -an which clashes with present indicative)
.L08 ò à emo

// hours and minutes
.L16 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 00 01 02 03 04 05 06 07 08 09 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23
.L17 0 1 2 3 4 5

// aeio
.L18 a e i o


.group a
       a              a
       a    (C%       a
       a    (L03L04_  a:
       a    (L05_     a:
       ao   (_        Ow
       ai             aj
       a    (L06_     'a:
       ane  (L18_     'anj

.group à
       à  ''a

.group ä
       ä  a:

.group â
       â  ''a:

.group æ
       æ       E:
       æ   (_  'E:
       æn      EN
       æn  (_  'EN

.group b
       b   b
       bb  b

.group c
       c          k
       cc         k
       ch         k
       cch        k
       cc  (Y     tS
       c   (Y     tS
       ci  (A     tS
       cci (A     tS
       cì         tS'i
       ccì        tS'i
       cî         tS'i:
       ccî        tS'i:
       ci  (L07_  tSj'
       ci  (L08_  tSj'

.group ç
       ç         s
       çion  (_  'sjuN

.group d
       d   d
       dd  d

.group e
       e             e
       e   (C%       e
       e   (L03L04_  e:
       e   (L05_     e:
       e   (L04_     'e:
       ei            ej
       ei   (L06_    'ej
       en  (_        'eN

.group è
       è  ''E

.group é
       é  ''e

.group ë
       ë  e:

.group ê
       ê  ''e:

.group eu
   _)  eu  (ro       ew
       eu  (C%       Y
       eu            Y:

.group f
       f   f
       ff  f

.group g
       g          g
       gg         g
       gn         n^
       gh         g
       ggh        g
       gg  (Y     dZ
       g   (Y     dZ
       gi  (A     dZ
       ggi (A     dZ
       gì         dZ''i
       ggì        dZ''i
       gî         dZ''i:
       ggî        dZ''i:
       gi  (L07_  dZj'
       gi  (L08_  dZj'


.group h
       h

.group i
       i             i
       i   (C%       i
       i   (L03L04_  i:
       i   (L05_     i:
       i   (A        j
       in  (_        'iN
   x)  i   (L04_     'i:
       i   (L06_     'i:
       i   (L07_     j'
       i   (L08_     j'

.group ì
       ì        ''i
       ì   (A_  ''i:

.group ï
       ï  i:

.group î
       î  ''i:

.group j
       j  dZ

.group k
       k   k
       kk  k

.group l
       l   l
       ll  l

.group m
       m      m
       mm     m
       m  (K  N

.group n
       n     n
       nn    n
       n (K  N

.group ñ
       ñ  N

.group o
       o             u
       ou            'Ow
       on  (_        'uN
       o   (L03L04_  u:
       o   (L05_     u:
       o   (æ        w

.group ò
       ò  ''O

.group ó
       ó  ''u

.group ô
       ô  ''u:

.group ö
       ö  O:

.group p
       p   p
       pp  p

.group q
       q       k

.group r
       r   R
       rr  R

.group s
       s          s
  L01) s    (A    z
       s    (L02  z
       ss         s

.group sc
       sc          sk
       sch         sk
       sc   (c     S
       sc   (Y     S
       sci  (A     S
       scì         S'i
       scî         S'i:
       sci  (L07_  Sj'
       sci  (L08_  Sj'

.group t
       t   t
       tt  t

.group u
       u            y
   g)  u  (A        w
   q)  u  (A        w
       u  (L04_     'y:
       u  (L03L04_  y:
       u  (L05_     y:

.group ù
       ù  ''y

.group ü
       ü  y:

.group û
       û  ''y:

.group v
       v   v
       vv  v

.group x
       x        Z

.group y
       y  j

.group z
       z   z
       zz  z

.group
       _L16_)	: (_L17D_	_%%e_	// say the time
